
F17330

Battery

ALT J/BNo.3
1 B−G

3C
1

Cowl Side J/B RH

VGRS

1 2 3H
1

W
V16

1

2

VGRS ECU

PIG

PGNDW−B

Cowl Side J/B LH

2H
1

IF

F39
FL Block

V16

Cowl Side J/B RH

W−B
3H
2

II

(*1)

*1: RHD

(*2)

*2: LHD

DI−150
−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLEGEARRATIOSTEERING

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM1072E)

DTC C 1555 / 55 Predriver Malfuncion

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the predriver, it turns the warning light on and records the
DTC at the same time, and then stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1555/55
Even when the estimated value of the motor power source
current isat least10A, thesystemdetects that theactualmo-
tor power source current is less than 3 A for 0.1 sec.

SPowersourcecircuit
SVGRSECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
After the procedure, perform the counter clearance (See page DI−106).

1 Checkforanopenorshortcircuit in theharnessandconnectorbetweentermi-
nal PGND of VGRS ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch OFF.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminal PGND of VGRS ECU and
body ground.
OK:

Lessthan 1 �

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

2CheckoutputofDTCC 1522/22.

CHECK:
Turn the ignition switch ON and check the DTC (See page DI−91).
OK:

DTCC 1522/22 ispresent

OKFlowofDTCC 1522/22.

NG

Replace VGRS ECU.


